Maryland, session 2025, SB0873.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–203.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “OFFENSIVE CONTACT” MEANS
NONCONSENSUAL PHYSICAL CONTACT THAT A REASONABLE PERSON WOULD FIND
TO BE OFFENSIVE.
(2) “OFFENSIVE CONTACT” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) CONTACT THAT RESULTS IN PHYSICAL INJURY;
(II) CONTACT THAT CAUSES A RISK OF SERIOUS PHYSICAL
INJURY;
(III) A DOMESTICALLY RELATED CRIME, AS DEFINED IN § 6–233
OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE; OR
(IV) A SEXUAL CRIME UNDER SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT:
(1) INTENTIONALLY CAUSE OFFENSIVE CONTACT;

SENATE BILL 873 3
(2) ENGAGE IN CONDUCT INTENDING TO PUT ANOTHER IN FEAR OF
OFFENSIVE CONTACT; OR
(3) ATTEMPT TO CAUSE OFFENSIVE CONTACT.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF THE
MISDEMEANOR OF ASSAULT IN THE THIRD DEGREE AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT
TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 90 DAYS OR A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500 OR
BOTH.
3–206.
(a) An indictment, information, other charging document, or warrant for a crime
described in § 3–202, § 3–203, or § 3–205 of this subtitle is sufficient if it substantially
states:
“(name of defendant) on (date) in (county) assaulted (name of victim) in the ........
degree or (describe other violation) in violation of (section violated) against the peace,
government, and dignity of the State.”.
(b) If the general form of indictment or information described in subsection (a) of
this section is used to charge a crime described in § 3–202, § 3–203, or § 3–205 of this
subtitle in a case in the circuit court, the defendant, on timely demand, is entitled to a bill
of particulars.
(c) A charge of assault in the first degree also charges a defendant with assault
in the second degree.
(d) (1) UNLESS SPECIFICALLY CHARGED BY THE STATE, ASSAULT IN THE
THIRD DEGREE UNDER § 3–203.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS NOT A LESSER INCLUDED
CRIME OF ANY OTHER CRIME.
(2) A CHARGING DOCUMENT OR WARRANT FOR A CRIME DESCRIBED
IN § 3–203.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS SUFFICIENT IF IT SUBSTANTIALLY STATES:
“(NAME OF DEFENDANT) ON (DATE) IN (COUNTY) COMMITTED ASSAULT IN THE
THIRD DEGREE AGAINST (NAME OF VICTIM) IN VIOLATION OF § 3–203.1 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE AGAINST THE PEACE, GOVERNMENT, AND DIGNITY OF THE
STATE.”.
(E) (1) To be found guilty of reckless endangerment under § 3–204 of this
subtitle, a defendant must be charged specifically with reckless endangerment.

SENATE BILL 873
(2) A charging document for reckless endangerment under § 3–204 of this
subtitle is sufficient if it substantially states:
“(name of defendant) on (date) in (county) committed reckless endangerment in
violation of § 3–204 of the Criminal Law Article against the peace, government, and dignity
of the State.”.
(3) If more than one individual is endangered by the conduct of the
defendant, a separate charge may be brought for each individual endangered.
(4) A charging document containing a charge of reckless endangerment
under § 3–204 of this subtitle may:
(i) include a count for each individual endangered by the conduct of
the defendant; or
(ii) contain a single count based on the conduct of the defendant,
regardless of the number of individuals endangered by the conduct of the defendant.
(5) If the general form of charging document described in paragraph (2) of
this subsection is used to charge reckless endangerment under § 3–204 of this subtitle in a
case in the circuit court, the defendant, on timely demand, is entitled to a bill of particulars.
3–209.
(a) Subject to [subsection (b)] SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) of this section, a person
charged with a crime under § 3–202, § 3–203, § 3–203.1, § 3–204, or § 3–205 of this subtitle
may assert any judicially recognized defense.
(b) The discovery or perception of, or belief about, another person’s race, color,
national origin, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, religious beliefs, or disability,
whether or not accurate, is not a defense to the crime of assault in any degree.
(C) A PHYSICAL INJURY OF A VICTIM RESULTING FROM A VIOLATION OF §
3–203.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS NOT A DEFENSE TO A CHARGE UNDER § 3–203.1 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
4–301.
(b) Except as provided in § 4–302 of this subtitle, the District Court also has
exclusive original jurisdiction in a criminal case in which a person at least 18 years old or
a corporation is charged with:

SENATE BILL 873 5
(1) Commission of a common–law or statutory misdemeanor regardless of
the amount of money or value of the property involved;
(2) Violation of § 7–104, § 7–105, § 7–107, or § 7–108 of the Criminal Law
Article, whether a felony or a misdemeanor;
(3) Violation of a county, municipal, or other ordinance, if the violation is
not a felony;
(4) Criminal violation of a State, county, or municipal rule or regulation, if
the violation is not a felony;
(5) Doing or omitting to do any act made punishable by a fine,
imprisonment, or other penalty as provided by the particular law, ordinance, rule, or
regulation defining the violation if the violation is not a felony;
(6) Violation of § 8–103 of the Criminal Law Article, whether a felony or a
misdemeanor;
(7) Violation of § 8–203, § 8–204, § 8–205, § 8–206, § 8–207, § 8–208, or §
8–209 of the Criminal Law Article, whether a felony or misdemeanor;
(8) Forgery or violation of Title 8, Subtitle 6 of the Criminal Law Article,
whether a felony or misdemeanor;
(9) Violation of Title 27, Subtitle 4 of the Insurance Article, whether a
felony or a misdemeanor;
(10) Violation of § 9–1106 of the Labor and Employment Article;
(11) Violation of § 8–301 of the Criminal Law Article, whether a felony or
misdemeanor;
(12) Violation of § 2–209 of the Criminal Law Article;
(13) Violation of Title 2, Subtitle 5 of the Criminal Law Article;
(14) Violation of Title 11, Subtitle 5 of the Financial Institutions Article;
(15) Violation of § 10–604, § 10–605, § 10–606, § 10–607, § 10–607.1, or §
10–608 of the Criminal Law Article, whether a felony or misdemeanor;
(16) Violation of Title 7, Subtitle 3, Part III of the Criminal Law Article,
whether a felony or misdemeanor;
(17) Violation of § 20–102 of the Transportation Article, whether a felony or
misdemeanor;

SENATE BILL 873
(18) Violation of § 8–801 of the Criminal Law Article;
(19) Violation of § 8–604 of the Criminal Law Article;
(20) Violation of Title 8, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Criminal Law Article;
(21) Violation of § 16–801, § 16–802, § 16–803, or § 16–804 of the Election
Law Article;
(22) Violation of § 3–203(c) of the Criminal Law Article;
(23) Violation of § 11–208 of the Criminal Law Article as a second or
subsequent offense;
(24) Violation of § 11–721 of the Criminal Procedure Article as a second or
subsequent offense; [or]
(25) Violation of § 3–1102(b) or § 3–1103 of the Criminal Law Article; OR
(26) VIOLATION OF § 3–203.1 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
4–302.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the jurisdiction
of the District Court is concurrent with that of the circuit court in a criminal case:
(i) In which the penalty may be confinement for 3 years or more or
a fine of $2,500 or more; or
(ii) That is a felony, as provided in § 4–301(b)(2), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10),
(11), (12), (13), (14), (15), (16), (17), (18), (19), (20), (21), (22), (23), (24), and (25) of this
subtitle.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, a
circuit court does not have jurisdiction to try a case charging a violation of § 3–203.1, §
5–601, or § 5–620 of the Criminal Law Article.
(ii) A circuit court does have jurisdiction to try a case charging a
violation of § 3–203.1, § 5–601, or § 5–620 of the Criminal Law Article if the defendant:
1. Properly demands a jury trial;
2. Appeals as provided by law from a final judgment entered
in the District Court; or

SENATE BILL 873 7
3. Is charged with another offense arising out of the same
circumstances that is within a circuit court’s jurisdiction.
Article – Criminal Procedure
10–110.
(a) A person may file a petition listing relevant facts for expungement of a police
record, court record, or other record maintained by the State or a political subdivision of
the State if the person is convicted of:
(1) a misdemeanor that is a violation of:
(i) § 6–320 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article;
(ii) an offense listed in § 17–613(a) of the Business Occupations and
Professions Article;
(iii) § 5–712, § 19–304, § 19–308, or Title 5, Subtitle 6 or Subtitle 9 of
the Business Regulation Article;
(iv) § 3–1508 or § 10–402 of the Courts Article;
(v) § 14–1915, § 14–2902, or § 14–2903 of the Commercial Law
Article;
(vi) § 5–211 of this article;
(vii) [§ 3–203] § 3–203.1 or § 3–808 of the Criminal Law Article;
(viii) § 5–601 not involving the use or possession of cannabis, §
5–602(b)(1), § 5–618, § 5–619, § 5–620, § 5–703, § 5–708, or § 5–902 of the Criminal Law
Article;
(ix) § 6–105, § 6–108, § 6–205 (fourth degree burglary), § 6–206, §
6–301, § 6–303, § 6–306, § 6–307, § 6–402, or § 6–503 of the Criminal Law Article;
(x) § 7–104, § 7–203, § 7–205, § 7–304, § 7–308, or § 7–309 of the
Criminal Law Article;
(xi) § 8–103, § 8–206, § 8–401, § 8–402, § 8–404, § 8–406, § 8–408, §
8–503, § 8–521, § 8–523, or § 8–904 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xii) § 9–204, § 9–205, § 9–503, or § 9–506 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xiii) § 10–110, § 10–201, § 10–402, § 10–404, or § 10–502 of the
Criminal Law Article;

SENATE BILL 873
(xiv) § 11–303, § 11–306, or § 11–307 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xv) § 12–102, § 12–103, § 12–104, § 12–105, § 12–109, § 12–203, §
12–204, § 12–205, or § 12–302 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xvi) § 13–401, § 13–602, or § 16–201 of the Election Law Article;
(xvii) [§ 4–509 of the Family Law Article;
(xviii)] § 18–215 of the Health – General Article;
[(xix)] (XVIII) § 4–411 or § 4–2005 of the Housing and Community
Development Article;
[(xx)] (XIX) § 27–403, § 27–404, § 27–405, § 27–406, § 27–406.1, §
27–407, § 27–407.1, or § 27–407.2 of the Insurance Article;
[(xxi)] (XX) § 8–725.4, § 8–725.5, § 8–725.6, § 8–725.7, § 8–726, §
8–726.1, § 8–727.1, or § 8–738.2 of the Natural Resources Article or any prohibited act
related to speed limits for personal watercraft;
[(xxii)] (XXI) § 10–301, § 10–306, § 10–308.1, § 10–413(e)(1), § 10–418,
§ 10–502, § 10–611, or § 10–907(a) of the Natural Resources Article;
[(xxiii)] (XXII) § 5–307, § 5–308, § 6–602, § 7–402, or § 14–114 of
the Public Safety Article;
[(xxiv)] (XXIII) § 7–318.1, § 7–509, or § 10–507 of the Real Property
Article;
[(xxv)] (XXIV) § 9–124 of the State Government Article;
[(xxvi)] (XXV) § 13–1001, § 13–1004, § 13–1007, or § 13–1024 of
the Tax – General Article;
[(xxvii)] (XXVI) § 16–303 of the Transportation Article; or
[(xxviii)] (XXVII) the common law offenses of affray, rioting, criminal
contempt, battery, or hindering;
(2) a felony that is a violation of:
(i) § 7–104 of the Criminal Law Article;

SENATE BILL 873 9
(ii) the prohibition against possession with intent to distribute a
controlled dangerous substance under § 5–602 of the Criminal Law Article; or
(iii) § 6–202(a), § 6–203, or § 6–204 of the Criminal Law Article; or
(3) an attempt, a conspiracy, or a solicitation of any offense listed in item
(1) or (2) of this subsection.
(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a petition for
expungement under this section may not be filed earlier than 5 years after the person
satisfies the sentence or sentences imposed for all convictions for which expungement is
requested, including parole, probation, or mandatory supervision.
(2) A petition for expungement for [a violation of § 3–203 of the Criminal
Law Article or] common law battery may not be filed earlier than 7 years after the person
satisfies the sentence or sentences imposed for all convictions for which expungement is
requested, including parole, probation, or mandatory supervision.
(3) A petition for expungement for an offense classified as a domestically
related crime under § 6–233 of this article may not be filed earlier than 15 years after the
person satisfies the sentence or sentences imposed for all convictions for which
expungement is requested, including parole, probation, or mandatory supervision.
(4) Except as provided in paragraphs (5) and (6) of this subsection, a
petition for expungement of a felony may not be filed earlier than 7 years after the person
satisfies the sentence or sentences imposed for all convictions for which expungement is
requested, including parole, probation, or mandatory supervision.
(5) A petition for expungement of a conviction of possession with intent to
distribute cannabis under § 5–602 of the Criminal Law Article may not be filed earlier than
3 years after the person satisfies the sentence or sentences imposed for all convictions for
which expungement is requested, including parole, probation, or mandatory supervision.
(6) A petition for expungement of a conviction for § 6–202(a), § 6–203, or a
felony that is a violation of § 7–104 of the Criminal Law Article may not be filed earlier
than 10 years after the person satisfies the sentence or sentences imposed for all convictions
for which expungement is requested, including parole, probation, or mandatory
supervision.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
(a) There is a Workgroup to Study Adoption of a Statute for Assault in the Third
Degree.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:

SENATE BILL 873
(1) three members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President
of the Senate;
(2) three members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s designee;
(4) the Public Defender, or the Public Defender’s designee;
(5) the Executive Director of the Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention and
Policy, or the Executive Director’s designee;
(6) the President of the Maryland State’s Attorneys’ Association, or the
President’s designee;
(7) one retired State circuit court judge with expertise in criminal law,
appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Maryland;
(8) one faculty member of the University of Baltimore School of Law with
expertise in criminal law, appointed by the Dean of the University of Baltimore School of
Law; and
(9) one representative of a group supporting victims of domestic violence,
appointed by the Governor.
(c) The Chair of the Senate Judicial Proceedings Committee and the Chair of the
House Judiciary Committee shall jointly designate the chair of the Workgroup.
(d) The Office of the Attorney General and the Department of Legislative Services
shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall:
(1) study the expansion of the State law governing assault to include a
third degree;
(2) identify practical and legal issues that the addition of a third degree
assault prohibition under State law may have;

SENATE BILL 873 11
(3) make recommendations regarding the addition of a third degree assault
prohibition; and
(4) if the Workgroup recommends adoption of a third degree assault
prohibition, prepare draft legislation providing for the adoption of a third degree assault
prohibition, with the assistance of the Department of Legislative Services.
(g) On or before December 1, 2026, the Workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.